Hawaii statutes.
[§196D-11] Annual report. The
department shall submit an annual report to the governor and the legislature on
its work during the preceding year, the development status of the project, any
problems encountered, and any legislative actions that may be needed further to
improve the consolidated permit application and review process and implement
the intent of this chapter. [L 1988, c 301, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next